Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.033

Notice of excavation to pipeline companies.

(1) Before commencing any excavation, an excavator must notify pipeline companies of the scheduled commencement of excavation through a one-number locator service in the same manner as required for notifying facility operators of excavation under RCW 19.122.030. Pipeline companies have the same rights and responsibilities as facility operators under RCW 19.122.030 regarding excavation. Excavators have the same rights and responsibilities under this section as they have under RCW 19.122.030.

(2) Project owners, excavators, and pipeline companies have the same rights and responsibilities relating to excavation near pipelines that they have for excavation near underground facilities as provided in RCW 19.122.040.

(3) The state, and any subdivision or instrumentality of the state, including any unit of local government, must, when planning construction or excavation within one hundred feet, or greater distance if required by local ordinance, of a right-of-way or utility easement containing a transmission pipeline, notify the pipeline company of the scheduled commencement of work.

(4) Any unit of local government that issues permits under codes adopted pursuant to chapter 19.27 RCW must, when permitting construction or excavation within one hundred feet, or greater distance if required by local ordinance, of a right-of-way or utility easement containing a transmission pipeline:

(a) Notify the pipeline company of the permitted activity when it issues the permit; or

(b) Require, as a condition of issuing the permit, that the applicant consult with the pipeline company.

(5) The commission must assist local governments in obtaining hazardous liquid and gas pipeline location information and maps, as provided in RCW 81.88.080.

[ 2011 c 263 s 6; 2000 c 191 s 18.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.

Intent—Findings—Conflict with federal requirements—Short title—Effective date—2000 c 191: See RCW 81.88.005 and 81.88.900 through 81.88.902.